Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 1 ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY — HEALTH
§ 39-117. Criminal violation — Penalty.

Any person who willfully or negligently violates any of the provisions of the non-air quality public health or environmental protection laws or the terms of any lawful notice, order, permit, standard, rule or regulation issued pursuant thereto shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each separate violation or one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for continuing violations, whichever is greater.

Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of the air quality public health or environmental protection laws or the terms of any lawful notice, order, permit, standard or rule issued pursuant thereto shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day per violation. In addition, any person who knowingly releases into the ambient air any hazardous air pollutant listed pursuant to section 112 of the federal clean air act, 42 U.S.C. 7412, or any extremely hazardous substance listed pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 11002(a)(2) that is not listed under section 112, and who knows at the time that he thereby places another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per day, or by imprisonment of not more than fifteen (15) years or both such fine and imprisonment. Any person committing such violation that is an organization shall, upon conviction under this subsection, be subject to a fine of not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for each violation. For any air pollutant for which the environmental protection agency or the board of environmental quality has set an emissions standard or for any source for which a permit has been issued under title V of the clean air act amendments of 1990, a release of such pollutant in accordance with that standard or permit shall not constitute a violation of the provisions of this subsection.

Any person who willfully or negligently violates any Idaho national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) standard or limitation, permit condition or filing requirement shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation or for each day of a continuing violation. Any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation or certification in any Idaho NPDES form, in any notice or report required by an NPDES permit, or who knowingly renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation or for each day of a continuing violation.

§ 39-118. Review of plans.

Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, all plans and specifications for the construction of new sewage systems, sewage treatment plants or systems, other waste treatment or disposal facilities, public water supply systems or public water treatment systems or for material modification or expansion to existing sewage treatment plants or systems, waste treatment or disposal facilities, public water supply systems or public water treatment systems, shall be submitted to and approved by the director before construction may begin, and all construction shall be in substantial compliance therewith. Material modifications are those that are intended to increase system capacity or to alter the methods or processes employed. The director shall review plans and specifications and endeavor to resolve design issues within forty-two (42) days of submittal such that approval can be granted. If the director and applicant have not resolved design issues within forty-two (42) days or at any time thereafter, the applicant may file a written demand to the director for a decision. Upon receipt of such written demand, the director shall deliver a written decision to the applicant within no more than seven (7) days explaining any reasons for disapproval. The director shall maintain records of all written demands for decision made pursuant to this subsection with such records including the final decision rendered and the timeliness thereof. No material deviation shall be made from the approved plans and specifications without the prior approval of the director.

Plans meeting the following standards shall not require preconstruction approval by the director:

Plans for dairy systems pursuant to section 37-401, Idaho Code.

Plans developed to evidence compliance with storm water best management practices.

Plans developed for routine maintenance or equipment replacement activities.

Plans for sanitary sewer extensions, water main extensions, and storm drain extensions, when such facilities will be owned and operated by a city, county, quasi-municipal corporation or regulated public utility where such city, county, quasi-municipal corporation or regulated public utility provides for the review of such plans and specifications by a qualified licensed professional engineer to verify compliance with facility standards and approves construction plans prior to initiation of construction. Any plans approved pursuant to this subsection shall be transmitted to the director at the time construction is authorized along with a statement that the plans comply with the facility standards and that construction has been authorized by the public agency or public utility. At the discretion of any city, county, quasi-municipal corporation or regulated public utility, the plans addressed by this subsection may be referred to the director for review and approval prior to initiation of construction.

Within thirty (30) days of the completion of construction of facilities for which plans are required to be reviewed pursuant to subsection (1) or subsection (2)(d) of this section, record plans and specifications based on information provided by the construction contractor and field observations made by the engineer or the engineer’s designee depicting the actual construction of facilities performed must be submitted to the director by the engineer representing the public agency or regulated public utility, if the resultant facilities will be owned and operated by a public agency or regulated public utility, or by the design engineer or owner-designated substitute engineer if the constructed facilities will not be owned and operated by a public agency or regulated public utility. Such submittal by the professional engineer must confirm material compliance with the approved plans or disclose any material deviations therefrom. If construction does not materially deviate from the original plans and specifications previously provided to the department, the owner may have a statement to that effect prepared by a licensed professional engineer and filed with the department in lieu of submitting a complete and accurate set of record drawings.
(4) All plans and specifications submitted to satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) of this section and all plans approved pursuant to subsection (2)(d) of this section shall be in compliance with applicable facility and design standards and conform in style and quality to regularly accepted engineering standards. The department shall review plans to determine compliance with applicable facility standards and engineering standards of care. As long as the plans and specifications comply with applicable facility and design standards, the department shall not substitute its judgment for that of the owner’s design engineer concerning the manner of compliance with design standards. Except with respect to plans and specifications for facilities addressed in subsection (5) of this section, and confined animal feeding operations, the board may require that certain types of plans and specifications must be stamped by registered professional engineers. If the director determines that any particular facility or category of facilities will produce no significant impact on the environment or on the public health, the director shall be authorized to waive the submittal or approval requirement for that facility or category of facilities.

§ 39-118A. Ore processing by cyanidation.

All plans and specifications for the construction of a cyanidation facility shall be submitted to and approved by the department before construction may begin, and all construction shall be in compliance therewith. Within thirty (30) days of the completion of such construction, modification or expansion, complete and accurate plans and specifications depicting that actual construction, modification or expansion does not deviate from the original approved plans and specifications shall be submitted to the department. All plans and specifications submitted to satisfy the requirements of this section shall be certified by registered professional engineers.

A cyanidation facility shall not be constructed, operated, or closed prior to a permit being obtained from the department.
(2)(a) A cyanidation facility shall not be constructed, operated, or closed prior to a permit being obtained from the department.

Weather permitting, the director shall deliver to the operator within one hundred eighty (180) days after the receipt of a complete permit application the notice of rejection or notice of approval of the permit, as the case may be, provided however, that, subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, if the director fails to deliver a notice of approval or notice of rejection within the time period, the permit submitted shall be deemed to comply with this chapter, and the operator may commence to build, operate or close the cyanidation facility covered by the permit, as the case may be, as if a notice of approval of the permit had been received from the director. Provided however, that if weather conditions prevent the director from inspecting the cyanidation facility to obtain information needed to approve or reject a submitted permit, he may, in writing to the operator, extend the time not to exceed thirty (30) days after weather conditions permit such inspection.

The director may require a reasonable fee for processing permit applications.

Prior to the effective date of rules promulgated under chapter 15, title 47, Idaho Code, the department is authorized to issue a permit under subsection (2) of this section if the cyanidation facility has provided financial assurance under the provisions of IDAPA 58.01.13 in an amount determined by the department to be the estimated reasonable costs to complete the activities specified in the permanent closure plan required in IDAPA 58.01.13, in the event of the failure of an operator to complete those activities, plus ten percent (10%) of such costs. In setting the amount of financial assurance, the department shall avoid duplication with any financial assurance, bonds and sureties deposited with other governmental agencies.
(3)(a) Prior to the effective date of rules promulgated under chapter 15, title 47, Idaho Code, the department is authorized to issue a permit under subsection (2) of this section if the cyanidation facility has provided financial assurance under the provisions of IDAPA 58.01.13 in an amount determined by the department to be the estimated reasonable costs to complete the activities specified in the permanent closure plan required in IDAPA 58.01.13, in the event of the failure of an operator to complete those activities, plus ten percent (10%) of such costs. In setting the amount of financial assurance, the department shall avoid duplication with any financial assurance, bonds and sureties deposited with other governmental agencies.

After the effective date of rules promulgated under chapter 15, title 47, Idaho Code, the department shall not issue a permit under subsection (2) of this section unless a permanent closure plan for the cyanidation facility has been submitted for approval under chapter 15, title 47, Idaho Code. Any permit issued by the department under subsection (2) of this section shall prohibit construction and operation of the cyanidation facility until the permittee submits proof acceptable to the department that financial assurance for the cyanidation facility permanent closure plan has been provided as required by chapter 15, title 47, Idaho Code.

A cyanidation facility with an existing permit approved by the department prior to July 1, 2005, shall be subject to the applicable laws and rules for ore processing by cyanidation in effect on June 30, 2005. If there is a material modification or a material expansion of a cyanidation facility after June 30, 2005, all provisions of this chapter shall apply to the modification or expansion; provided however, that reclamation or closure-related activities at a facility with an existing cyanidation permit approved by the department that did not actively add cyanide after January 1, 2005, shall not be considered to be material modifications or a material expansion of the facility.
(5) The department shall promulgate temporary rules by August 1, 2005, to implement the provisions of this act; however, no rulemaking is necessary, nor shall be required, to increase the amount of financial assurance provided by the department’s interim authority under subsection (3)(a) of this section.

§ 39-118B. Relationship to federal law.

The board may promulgate rules and regulations to ensure that the state of Idaho is in compliance with the provisions of the federal clean air act. To the extent that the federal clean air act sets forth or the United States environmental protection agency adopts or has adopted a specific standard, emission limitation or control technology requirement under the clean air act, a more stringent standard, emission limitation or control technology requirement promulgated by the board shall not become effective until specifically approved by statute.

§ 39-118C. Legislative findings and declaration of purpose.

The legislature finds that it is an obligation of the state of Idaho under title V of the clean air act to provide for an operating permit program for sources of air pollution within the state.

The purpose of these amendments to the environmental protection and health act is to meet the state’s obligation to protect air quality with a cost-effective operating permit program.

The legislature intends that the department’s regulation under title V of the clean air act shall take advantage of the flexibility authorized by the federal clean air act to establish reasonable and cost-effective requirements. Such requirements shall include, but not be limited to:

Operating flexibility provisions;

Provisions allowing off-permit changes;

Provisions that limit federally enforceable hazardous air pollutant requirements to that group of pollutants listed under section 112 of the federal clean air act (to the extent that the operating permits address hazardous air pollutants);

Provisions for operating permits to be issued for fixed terms of five (5) years; provided that, in order to facilitate the implementation of the title V operating permit program, the director may issue operating permits with terms of from three (3) to five (5) years during the first three (3) years following environmental protection agency approval of Idaho’s title V operating permit program so long as those permits with fixed terms of less than five (5) years are renewed with terms of five (5) years thereafter; and provided further that if the maximum operating permit term under the federal clean air act should be extended beyond five (5) years, the director shall similarly extend the term of operating permits issued under the Idaho program; and provided further, that shorter terms are allowable when mutually agreed upon by the department and the applicant;

Provisions for adequate, streamlined and reasonable procedures for processing modifications, including establishing criteria to determine insignificant changes that shall not require a permit modification, and establishing classes of modifications based on significance which shall include a minor modification class for which modifications may be processed in group as authorized by 40 CFR 70.7(e)(3) as may be amended; and

Provisions allowing an existing source to make changes that reduce emissions without applying for a permit to construct or an amendment to an operating permit; provided, however, that an existing source that makes such changes may seek and obtain an operating permit modification if it chooses.

§ 39-118D. Idaho air quality permitting fund.

All moneys received from fees collected from the pollution sources requiring permitting under title V of the federal clean air act amendments of 1990 shall be forwarded to the department of environmental quality and shall be paid into the Idaho air quality permitting fund which is hereby created in the office of the state treasurer.

Such moneys and all interest earned thereon shall be kept in the Idaho air quality permitting fund and shall be expended for the technical, legal and administrative support necessary for implementing the operating permit program required under title V of the federal clean air act amendments of 1990.

All salaries, costs and expenses incurred by the department of environmental quality in performing the duties and the exercise of its powers in carrying out the operating permit program required under title V of the federal clean air act amendments of 1990 shall be paid out of the air quality permitting fund.

§ 39-118E. Small business assistance.

The department shall implement a small business assistance program as required in 42 U.S.C. 7661A [7661a].

§ 39-119. Collection of fees for services.

The department of environmental quality is hereby authorized to charge and collect reasonable fees, established by standards formulated by the director and approved by the board through rulemaking, for any service rendered by the department.

§ 39-120. Department of environmental quality primary administrative agency — Agency responsibilities.

The department of environmental quality is designated as the primary agency to coordinate and administer ground water quality protection programs for the state.

Recognizing that the department of water resources has the responsibility to maintain the natural resource geographic information system for the state and is the collector of baseline data for the state’s water resources, that the department of environmental quality has the responsibility for collecting and monitoring data for water quality management purposes and that the department of agriculture is responsible for regulating the use of pesticides and fertilizers and for licensing applicators, the department of environmental quality, the department of water resources and the department of agriculture shall:

Develop a ground water monitoring plan, concurrently with the development of a ground water quality plan, for development and administration of a comprehensive ground water quality monitoring network, including point of use, point of contamination and problem assessment monitoring sites across the state and the assessment of ambient ground water quality utilizing, to the greatest degree possible, collection and coordination of existing data sources.

Establish a system or systems within state departments and political subdivisions of the state for collecting, evaluating and disseminating ground water quality data and information.

Develop and maintain a natural resource geographic information system and comprehensive water resource data system. The system shall be accessible to the public.

The responsible state departments or boards should adopt rules which specify the general standards for determining actions necessary to prevent ground water contamination and cleanup actions necessary to meet the goals of the state.

The director of the department of environmental quality may develop and recommend for approval by the board through rulemaking, ambient ground water quality standards for contaminants for which the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency has established drinking water maximum contaminant levels. The director may develop and recommend for approval by the board, through rulemaking, ground water quality standards for contaminants for which the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency has not established drinking water maximum contaminant levels. However, the existence of such standards, or the lack of them, should not be construed or utilized in derogation of the ground water quality protection goal and protection policies of the state.

The departments of environmental quality, water resources and agriculture should take actions necessary to promote and assure public confidence and public awareness of ground water quality protection. In pursuing this goal, the departments and public health districts should make public the results of investigations concerning ground water quality subject to the restrictions contained in section 39-111, Idaho Code.

§ 39-121. Definitions.

As used in section 39-102, Idaho Code, and in sections 39-120 through 39-127, Idaho Code:

“Cleanup” means removal, treatment or isolation of a contaminant from ground water through the directed efforts of humans or the removal or treatment of a contaminant in ground water through management practice or the construction of barriers, trenches and other similar facilities for prevention of contamination, as well as the use of natural processes such as ground water recharge, natural decay and chemical or biological decomposition.

“Contaminant” means any chemical, ion, radionuclide, synthetic organic compound, microorganism, waste or other substance which does not occur naturally in ground water or which naturally occurs at a lower concentration.

“Contamination” means the direct or indirect introduction into ground water of any contaminant caused in whole or in part by human activities.

“Ground water” means any water of the state which occurs beneath the surface of the earth in a saturated geological formation of rock or soil.

“Ground water quality plan” or “ground water quality protection plan” means the Idaho ground water quality plan adopted by the legislature in section 1, chapter 310, laws of 1992, and in section 1, chapter 273, laws of 1995.

§ 39-122, 39-123. Ground water quality council created; completion of ground water quality plan. [Repealed.]

§ 39-124. Legislative findings

Intent. [Null and void.]

§ 39-125. Moratorium on construction of certain coal fired power plants

Report. [Null and void.]

§ 39-126. Duties of state and local units of government.

All state agencies shall incorporate the adopted ground water quality protection plan in the administration of their programs and shall have such additional authority to promulgate rules to protect ground water quality as necessary to administer such programs which shall be in conformity with the ground water quality protection plan. Cities, counties and other political subdivisions of the state shall incorporate the ground water quality protection plan in their programs and are also authorized and encouraged to implement ground water quality protection policies within their respective jurisdictions, provided that the implementation is consistent with and not preempted by the laws of the state, the ground water quality protection plan and any rules promulgated thereunder. All state agencies, cities, counties and other political subdivisions shall cooperate with the department of environmental quality, the department of agriculture and the department of water resources in disseminating public information and education materials concerning the use and protection of ground water quality, in collecting ground water quality management data, and in conducting research on technologies to prevent or remedy contamination of ground water.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, whenever a state agency, city, county or other political subdivision of the state issues a permit or license which deals with the environment, the entity issuing the permit or license shall take into account the effect the permitted or licensed activity will have on the ground water quality of the state and it may attach conditions to the permit or license in order to mitigate potential or actual adverse effects from the permitted or licensed activity on the ground water quality of the state. Nothing contained in this section shall authorize a state agency, city, county or other political subdivision of the state to issue or require a permit or license which it is not otherwise allowed by law to issue or require.

Except as otherwise provided by the ground water quality protection plan, if a permit or license which deals with the environment is required to be obtained from a state agency and that agency considers the effect of the permitted or licensed activity on ground water quality, after notice to other units of government which may otherwise have regulatory authority over the activity which is the subject of the permit or license, a city, county or other political subdivision of the state shall not prohibit, limit or otherwise condition the rights of the permittee or licensee under the permit or license on account of the effect the permitted or licensed activity may have on ground water quality.

Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to permit cities, counties or other political subdivisions of the state to regulate ground water quality with respect to any activity for which another statute or other statutes may have expressly or impliedly preempted such local ground water quality regulation.

§ 39-127. Application of fertilizers and pesticides.

No person shall be liable for ground water contamination resulting from the application of fertilizers or pesticides if the person applies a fertilizer according to generally accepted agronomic practices, or applies a pesticide product registered under the federal insecticide, fungicide, rodenticide act according to label requirements, including precautionary statements, of the U.S. environmental protection agency, and such application of the pesticide or fertilizer is otherwise done with the proper equipment required by law, is without negligence and is in accordance with state laws.

§ 39-128. Applicability — Promulgation of rules — Establishment of zones — Combustor charging composition and recordkeeping — Report to local government — Permit processing.

Except as provided in subsection 2 of this section, the provisions of this section shall apply to medical waste combustors with a maximum rated capacity equal to or greater than three (3) tons per day. All combustors located on one (1) or more contiguous or adjacent properties and owned or operated by the same person or persons under common control shall be considered in determining the maximum rated capacity of a combustor.

The department is hereby directed to develop and propose, and the board is hereby directed to adopt, rules and regulations controlling emissions of air contaminants from all medical waste combustors, and implementing the provisions of this section except the provisions of subsections 8 and 9.

The following zones are hereby established:

a. Zone 1, consisting of the counties of Benewah, Bonner, Boundary, Clearwater, Idaho, Kootenai, Latah, Lewis, Nez Perce and Shoshone.

b. Zone 2, consisting of the counties of Ada, Adams, Boise, Canyon, Elmore, Gem, Owyhee, Payette, Valley and Washington.

c. Zone 3, consisting of the counties of Bannock, Bear Lake, Bingham, Blaine, Bonneville, Butte, Camas, Caribou, Cassia, Clark, Custer, Franklin, Fremont, Gooding, Jefferson, Jerome, Lemhi, Lincoln, Madison, Minidoka, Oneida, Power, Teton and Twin Falls.

4. Any county may petition the director to become incorporated into an adjacent zone. The director shall grant the petition provided it does not conflict with the purposes of this act, or any rule, regulation, permit or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this act.

5. For any combustor constructed or modified after the date of enactment of this section, no less than seventy per cent (70%) of the weight of the material charged into the combustor on an annual basis shall be material generated inside the zone in which the combustor is located.

6. An owner or operator of a combustor constructed and operated prior to the date of enactment of this section shall, by October 1, 1992, notify the department in writing describing the type, location and maximum rated capacity of the combustor.

7. Any person who owns or operates a combustor shall keep records as to the source, weight and type of material charged, and whether the material was generated within or outside the zone in which the combustor is located. These records shall be maintained for a period of not less than five (5) years and shall be made available to the department upon request. The requirements of this subsection may be fully or partially waived by the director if the owner or operator certifies to the department that no material generated outside the zone shall be charged into the combustor.

8. Any person proposing to construct or modify a combustor shall provide, in writing, to the local government a comprehensive report which shall include:

a. An overall description of the project;

b. The amount, type and disposal method of all solid waste produced;

c. The amount and content of any liquid to be discharged into the sewer system, applied to the land, or discharged into an impoundment or pond;
d. The amount, type and control of air emissions;

e. The effect of the facility on vehicular traffic;

f. The amount of noise produced by the facility;

g. The extent and control of odors from the facility; and

h. Any additional information requested, in writing, by the local government pertaining to the effect of the proposed facility upon the community or local resources.

9. The local government shall conduct at least one (1) public hearing regarding any proposal to construct or modify a combustor within the jurisdiction of the local government at which interested persons shall have an opportunity to be heard. At least fifteen (15) days prior to the hearing, notice of the time and place of the hearing, a brief summary of the proposal, and the location of the comprehensive report required by the provisions of subsection 8 of this section, shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction of the local government. The local government shall, after hearing, notify in writing the person proposing to construct or modify the combustor that the proposal conforms or does not conform to applicable planning and zoning ordinances. Reasonable conditions may be placed on any approval so as to ensure that construction or modification of the combustor is in conformance with local planning and zoning ordinances and that all necessary local, state and federal permits are obtained.

10. Any person applying to the department for a permit to construct or modify a combustor shall submit, as part of the application, the notification required in subsection 8 of this section indicating that the proposal conforms, or conforms with conditions, to local government planning and zoning ordinances. Any application received by the department which does not include such a notification of approval or conditional approval shall be incomplete.

11. The director shall have authority to sue in competent courts to enjoin any threatened or continuing violation of the provisions of this section, or any rule, regulation, permit or order issued or promulgated to implement the provisions of this section. The court shall grant injunctive relief upon a showing that a violation of the provisions of this section or any rule, regulation, permit or order implementing the provisions of this section has occurred and is reasonably likely to continue.

12. The director shall have the authority to declare that an emergency exists and that a combustor may receive a waiver to combust material generated outside the zone in which the combustor is located in excess of the amount specified in subsection 5 of this section, provided the director finds that such an action is necessary to protect human health and the environment. The waiver shall not extend beyond six (6) months for any single combustor and eighteen (18) months in total duration.

13. For purposes of this section only:

a. The term “combustor” means a medical waste combustor as defined in section 39-103, Idaho Code.

b. The term “local government” means the city government for the city in which the combustor is to be located or, if the combustor is to be located outside the limits of an incorporated city, the county government for the county in which the combustor is to be located.

§ 39-129. Applicability — Definition of local government and mandates — Authorization for local government agreements — Adoption of rules — Establishment of schedules — Priority of considerations — Report and recommendations.

The provisions of this section shall apply to local governments providing drinking water, municipal waste disposal, municipal sewage or waste water disposal or treatment, or air pollution abatement, which can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that increasing and cumulative regulatory requirements applicable to such services cannot be met in a timely and reasonable manner. The provisions of the section do not apply where prohibited by federal or state laws or regulations for the protection of human health and the environment.

For purposes of this section the term “local government” means the government of a county or incorporated city, and the term “federal mandates” means those requirements arising from federal statutes or subsequent regulations administered by the United States environmental protection agency.

The department is hereby authorized to enter into agreements with local governments. The agreement may include a binding schedule enforceable under this chapter for the improvement, modification, construction, or other actions, necessary in order for the local government to come into compliance as expeditiously as practicable with human health and environmental protection statutes and rules stemming from federal mandates.

The department may propose, and the board adopt, rules necessary for the implementation of this section.

In establishing any local government agreement schedule, the term of the agreement shall not exceed fifteen (15) years, although successive agreements may be entered into. All agreements must be signed by the director or his designee and the mayor of the city or county commissioners of the county, as appropriate. All agreements are enforceable as orders under the provisions of this chapter.

Agreements and schedules entered into under this act shall take into account, in descending priority the:

Protection of public health;

Protection of the environment;

Current tax structure and rates as compared to other local governments;

Ability of the local government to pay for costs of compliance;

Current fiscal obligations of the local government;

Other factors as determined by the department or the board.

§ 39-130. Removal — Remediation — Bunker Hill mining and metallurgical complex superfund facility.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, removal and remediation actions in or related to any operable unit of the Bunker Hill mining and metallurgical complex superfund facility performed by or on behalf of the department of environmental quality shall not constitute public works pursuant to chapter 57, title 67, Idaho Code, chapter 19, title 54, Idaho Code, or any other provision of Idaho Code. In the letting and oversight of contracts for such removal or remediation actions, bonding of contractors may be required. The administrator of the division of waste management and remediation, department of environmental quality, and the director of the department of environmental quality, shall have the authority of the administrator of the division of purchasing, department of administration, and the director of the department of administration, respectively, in requiring open competitive bidding pursuant to chapter 92, title 67, Idaho Code, and any relevant rules of the department of administration.

§ 39-131 — 39-136. Emergency medical services — Intent — Definitions — Authorized actions — Rules and regulations — Liability — Failure to obtain consent. [Repealed.]

§ 39-137 — 39-138. [Reserved.]

§ 39-171. Legislative findings and purpose.

The legislature of the state of Idaho finds that:

Wood and mill yard debris is a byproduct of wood processing and manufacturing; and

If properly managed, wood and mill yard debris can be put to uses that have economic and environmental benefits; and

There is a need for guidance about how to manage, store, use or dispose of wood and mill yard debris so that nuisance and adverse environmental impacts are minimized; and

This guidance will enable the department and local units of government to more effectively regulate the use or disposal of wood and mill yard debris.

The purpose of sections 39-171 through 39-174, Idaho Code, is to provide guidance for the sound use, storage, management and disposal of wood and mill yard debris by requiring the director of the department of environmental quality to appoint a committee to study the issues and to gather and disseminate information to persons and entities that deal with wood and mill yard debris.

§ 39-172. Definitions.

For purposes of sections 39-171 through 39-174, Idaho Code:

“Committee” means the wood and mill yard debris committee.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho department of environmental quality.

“Wood or mill yard debris” means solid wood, bark, or wood fiber generated from the process of manufacturing wood products that may include components of soil, rock, or moisture, and for which the use, management, storage or final disposition is approved pursuant to sections 39-171 through 39-174, Idaho Code.

§ 39-173. Committee — Members — Terms.

As needed, to fulfill the duties described in section 39-174, Idaho Code, the director may appoint a committee that consists of seven (7) individuals and includes:

One (1) representative of the department of environmental quality, who will provide administrative and other support to the committee.

Two (2) representatives of the public health districts which have mill yard or wood debris within their districts.

Two (2) representatives from industries generating wood or mill yard debris.

Two (2) members with demonstrated technical knowledge important to the work of the committee.

Committee members shall be appointed to serve three (3) year terms. No member may serve more than two (2) full terms. Members serve at the pleasure of the director.

Members of the committee shall serve without compensation pursuant to section 59-509(a), Idaho Code.